Utah statutes.
41-22-36.   Fees to cover the costs of electronic payments.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Electronic payment" has the same meaning as defined in Section
41-1a-1221.
(b)  "Electronic payment fee" has the same meaning as defined in Section
41-1a-1221.
(2) (a)  The Motor Vehicle Division may collect an electronic payment fee on
all registrations and renewals of registration under Section 41-22-8.
(b)  The fee described in Subsection (2)(a) shall be imposed regardless of the
method of payment for a particular transaction.
(3)  The division shall establish the fee according to the procedures and
requirements of Section 63J-1-504.
(4)  A fee imposed under this section:
(a)  shall be used by the Motor Vehicle Division as a dedicated credit to
cover the costs of electronic payments;
(b)  is not subject to Subsection 63J-2-202(2); and
(c)  need not be separately identified from the fees imposed on registrations
and renewals of registration under Section 41-22-8.
